Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-421
Petitions; requirements; verification; costs.

All petitions provided for in sections 19-401 to 19-433 shall be subject to and meet the requirements of sections 32-628 to 32-630. Upon the filing of a petition or supplementary petition, a city, upon passage of a resolution by the city council, and the county clerk or election commissioner of the county in which such city is located may by mutual agreement provide that the county clerk or election commissioner shall ascertain whether the petition or supplementary petition is signed by the requisite number of legal voters. The city shall reimburse the county for any costs incurred by the county clerk or election commissioner.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 18, p. 164;

R.S.1913, § 5305;

C.S.1922, § 4528;

C.S.1929, § 19-418;

R.S.1943, § 19-421;

Laws 1983, LB 281, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 515.

Verification inadvertently omitted may be attached after petitions are filed. State ex rel. Miller v. Berg, 97 Neb. 63, 149 N.W. 61 (1914).

A petition filed under Nebraska referendum act did not suspend an ordinance providing for an election and vote on question whether Nebraska City should proceed to condemn power company's property. Central Power Co. v. Nebraska City, 112 F.2d 471 (8th Cir. 1940).